Hawaii statutes.
[§11-384] Disposition of campaign
funds; termination of registration. (a) The candidate committee and
candidate who receives contributions for an election but fails to file
nomination papers for that election shall return residual funds to the contributors
no later than ninety days after the date on which nominations for that election
shall be filed. Funds not returned to contributors shall escheat to the Hawaii
election campaign fund.

(b) The candidate committee and candidate who
withdraws or ceases to be a candidate for the election because of death,
disqualification, or other reasons shall return residual funds to the
contributors no later than ninety days after the candidate ceases to be a
candidate. Funds not returned to contributors shall escheat to the Hawaii
election campaign fund.

(c) A candidate who is elected to office,
including a candidate subject to term limits and a candidate who resigned
before the end of the term of office and the candidate committee of such a
candidate, may use campaign funds as provided in section 11-381 or return funds
to contributors until four years from the date of the election for which the
campaign funds were received. Funds that are not used or returned to
contributors shall escheat to the Hawaii election campaign fund.

(d) A candidate who loses an election and the
candidate committee of such a candidate may use campaign funds as provided in
section 11-381 or return funds to contributors until one year from the date of
the election for which the campaign funds were received. Funds that are not
used or returned to contributors shall escheat to the Hawaii election campaign
fund.

(e) A candidate committee that disposes of
campaign funds pursuant to this section shall terminate its registration with
the commission as provided in section 11-326.

(f) Notwithstanding any of the foregoing,
campaign funds may be used for the candidate's next subsequent election as
provided in section 11-381 upon registration for the election pursuant to
section 11-321.

(g) The commission shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this section. [L 2010, c 211, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next